Hawaii statutes.
§431:12-107 Payroll deductions and premium
collections. A mass merchandising agreement may provide for the collection
of premiums from employees by payroll deductions, assessments, or otherwise,
and the remittance of the same to the insurer by the employer; provided that:

(1) No such collection and remittance of premiums by
the employer shall constitute collection of premium within the meaning of this
code;

(2) No act of furnishing information about such
collection method by the employer to its employees shall constitute
solicitation of applications for insurance; and

(3) The employer shall not be considered an insurance
producer for purposes of this code by virtue of the employer's collection and
remittance of premiums or the furnishing of information about such collection
method. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2003, c 212, §102]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next